District of Columbia statutes.
34-2305

Administrative review.

Any owner or occupant of a property that receives water and sewer services may contest a water or sanitary sewer service bill rendered for water and sewer services in accordance with §§ 2-509 and 2-510, as set forth in rules issued by the Mayor pursuant to § 34-2306. The Mayor or the Authority shall require the owner or occupant to post a surety bond or deposit upon the filing of a request for an administrative hearing, except that the requirement to post a surety bond or deposit shall not apply to an owner who occupies a single family house. The amount of the surety bond or deposit shall be determined by the Mayor or the Authority and shall not be less than one-half of the total amount of charges, penalties, and interest owed. The surety bond or deposit shall be placed into an escrow account and accrue interest at a rate to be determined by the Mayor or the Authority.

May 18, 1954, ch. 218, title XVIII, § 1805
as added June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-136, § 2(g), 37 DCR 2620
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-183, § 3(c), 47 DCR 7062
D.C. Law 13-183 added “or the Authority” following “Mayor” in two instances in the second sentence.
1981 Ed., § 43-1655.
This section is referenced in § 34-2107, § 34-2202.16, and § 34-2302.